District of Columbia statutes.
28-4502

Contract, combination, or conspiracy to restrain trade.

Every contract, combination in the form of a trust or otherwise, or conspiracy in restraint of trade or commerce all or any part of which is within the District of Columbia is declared to be illegal.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368

Cross References

Prescription drugs, unfair trade restraints, see § 48-804.02.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28-4506.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-4502.